California statutes. Welfare and Institutions Code
(4) The hospital meets all of the following criteria:

(A) The hospital is contracting under Article 2.6 (commencing with Section 14081).

(B) The hospital satisfies the Medicaid State Plan criteria for disproportionate share hospital status.

(C) The hospital is a small and rural hospital as defined in Section 124840 of the Health and Safety Code.

(D) The hospital is a licensed provider of standby emergency services as described in Section 70649 of Title 22 of the California Code of Regulations.

(E) The hospital is able to demonstrate a purpose for
 additional funding under the selective provider contracting program with proposals relating to health care services that are made available, or will be made available, to Medi-Cal beneficiaries.

(F) The hospital is determined by the California Medical Assistance Commission to be a hospital that provides an important community service that otherwise would not be provided in the community.

(p) This section shall become inoperative on June 30, 2026, and, as of July 1, 2030, is repealed. The department may conduct any necessary and remaining duties related to this section even after the section becomes inoperative.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 21, Sec. 111.   (AB 116)   Effective June 30, 2025.   Inoperative June 30, 2026, by its own provisions.   Repealed as of July 1, 2030, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

14166.18.

(a) With respect to each project year, the director shall determine a baseline funding amount for each nondesignated public hospital that was an eligible hospital under paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) of Section 14105.98 for both the 2004–05 fiscal year and the project year. A hospital’s baseline funding amount shall be an amount equal to the total amount paid to the hospital for inpatient hospital services rendered to Medi-Cal beneficiaries during the 2004–05 fiscal year, including the
 following Medi-Cal payments, but excluding payments received under the Medi-Cal Specialty Mental Health Services Consolidation Program:

(1) Base payments under the selective provider contracting program as provided for under Article 2.6 (commencing with Section 14081) or the Medi-Cal state plan cost reimbursement system for inpatient hospital services for noncontracting hospitals.

(2) Emergency Services and Supplemental Payments Fund payments as provided for under Section 14085.6.

(3) Medi-Cal Medical Education Supplemental Payment Fund payments and Large Teaching Emphasis Hospital and Children’s Hospital Medi-Cal Medical Education Supplemental Payment Fund payments as provided for under Sections 14085.7 and 14085.8, respectively.

(4) Small and Rural
 Hospital Supplemental Payments Fund payments as provided for under Section 14085.9.

(5) Disproportionate share hospital payment adjustments as provided for under Section 14105.98.

(6) Administrative day payments as provided for under Section 51542 of Title 22 of the California Code of Regulations.

(b) The baseline funding amount for each nondesignated public hospital shall reflect a reduction for the total amount of intergovernmental transfers made pursuant to Sections 14085.6, 14085.7, 14085.8, 14085.9, and 14163 for the 2004–05 state fiscal year by the nondesignated public hospital, or on its behalf by the governmental entity with which it is affiliated.

(c) The aggregate nondesignated public hospital baseline funding amount shall be the sum of all
 baseline funding amounts determined under subdivision (a), as adjusted by subdivision (b).

(d) With respect to each project year beginning after the 2005–06 project year, an aggregate nondesignated public hospital adjusted baseline funding amount shall be determined as follows:

(1) The department shall determine the aggregate total Medi-Cal revenue, using amounts determined under subdivision (a), as adjusted by subdivision (b), but excluding the reductions for the amount of intergovernmental transfers made pursuant to Section 14163, with respect to inpatient hospital services rendered during the 2004–05 fiscal year, for nondesignated public hospitals that were eligible hospitals under paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) of Section 14105.98 for the project year, less the total amount of disproportionate share hospital payments identified in paragraph (5) of subdivision (a) for those
 hospitals.

(2) The department shall determine the aggregate total Medi-Cal revenue paid or payable for inpatient hospital services rendered during the fiscal year preceding the project year for which the nondesignated public hospital adjusted baseline funding amount is being calculated for the nondesignated public hospitals described in paragraph (1). The aggregate total revenue for services rendered in the particular preceding fiscal year shall include the payments that are described under paragraphs (1) and (6) of subdivision (a), and all other payments made to nondesignated public hospitals under this article, excluding disproportionate share hospital payments pursuant to Section 14166.16, stabilization funding pursuant to Section 14166.19, and distressed hospital funding pursuant to Section 14166.23 and paragraph (3) of subdivision (b) of Section 14166.20.

(3) The department
 shall:

(A) Calculate the difference between the amount determined under paragraph (1) and the amount determined under paragraph (2).

(B) Determine the percentage increase or decrease by dividing the difference in subparagraph (A) by the amount in paragraph (1).

(C) Apply the percentage determined in subparagraph (B) to the amount that results from both of the following:

(i) Aggregating the nondesignated public hospital baseline funding amounts determined under subdivision (a), as adjusted by subdivision (b), but excluding the reductions for the amount of intergovernmental transfers made pursuant to Section 14163.

(ii) Subtracting from the amount in clause (i) the total amount of
 disproportionate share hospital payments in paragraph (5) of subdivision (a) for those hospitals.

(D) The aggregate nondesignated public hospital adjusted baseline funding amount is the amount determined in subdivision (c), plus the resulting product determined in subparagraph (C).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 130, Sec. 250.   Effective January 1, 2008.   Conditionally inoperative as provided in Section 14166.26 or in subd. (b) or (g) of Section 14166.2.   Repealed on date prescribed in Section 14166.26 or in subd. (b) or (g) of Section 14166.2.)
-------------------------------------------

14166.19.

The amount of any stabilization funding payable to the nondesignated public hospitals under paragraph (4) of subdivision (b) of Section 14166.20 for a project year, which amount shall not include the amount of stabilization funding paid or payable to hospitals prior to the computation of the stabilization funding under Section 14166.20, shall be allocated in the following priority:

(a) An amount shall be transferred to the Nondesignated Public Hospital Supplemental Fund, as may be necessary so that the amount for the Nondesignated Public Hospital Supplemental Fund for the project year, including all funds previously transferred to, or deposited in, the Nondesignated Public Hospital Supplemental Fund for the project year, is not less than one million nine hundred thousand dollars ($1,900,000).

(b) Of the remaining stabilization funding payable to nondesignated public hospitals, 75 percent shall be allocated, distributed, and paid in accordance with Section 14166.16, and 25 percent shall be transferred to the Nondesignated Public Hospital Supplemental Fund.

(c) Notwithstanding any other law, the amount of any stabilization funding payable to nondesignated public hospitals under Section 14166.20 for
 a project year as determined under this section that has not been paid, or specifically committed for payment, to nondesignated public hospitals before January 1, 2012, shall not be paid pursuant to Section 14166.20. The funds that would otherwise be paid from the Nondesignated Public Hospital Supplemental Fund shall be transferred to the General Fund, and funds that would otherwise be drawn from the General Fund for payments to the nondesignated public hospitals pursuant to Section 14166.20 shall be retained in the General Fund.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 23, Sec. 98.   (AB 1467)   Effective June 27, 2012.   Conditionally inoperative as provided in Section 14166.26 or in subd. (b) or (g) of Section 14166.2.   Repealed on date prescribed in Section 14166.26 or in subd. (b) or (g) of Section 14166.2.)
-------------------------------------------

14166.20.

(a) With respect to each project year through October 31, 2010, the total amount of stabilization funding shall be the sum of the following:

(1) (A) Federal Medicaid funds available in the Health Care Support Fund, established pursuant to Section 14166.21, reduced by the amount necessary to meet the baseline
 funding amount, or the adjusted baseline funding amount, as appropriate, for project years after the 2005–06 project year for each designated public hospital, project year private DSH hospitals in the aggregate, and nondesignated public hospitals in the aggregate as determined in Sections 14166.5, 14166.13, and 14166.18, respectively, taking into account all other payments to each hospital under this article. This amount shall be not less than zero.

(B) For purposes of subparagraph (A), federal Medicaid funds available in the Health Care Support Fund shall not include health care coverage initiative amounts identified under paragraph (2) of subdivision (e) of Section 14166.9.

(C) The federal financial participation amount arising from the certified public expenditures that has been paid to designated public hospitals, or the governmental entities with which they are affiliated,
 pursuant to subdivision (g) of Section 14166.221, shall be disregarded for purposes of this section.

(2) The state general funds that were made available due to the receipt of federal funding for previously state-funded programs through the safety net care pool and any federal Medicaid hospital reimbursements resulting from these expenditures, unless otherwise recognized under paragraph (1), to the extent those funds are in excess of the amount necessary to meet the baseline funding amount, or the adjusted baseline funding amount, as appropriate, for project years after the 2005–06 project year for each designated public hospital, for project year private DSH hospitals in the aggregate, and for nondesignated public hospitals in the aggregate, as determined in Sections 14166.5, 14166.13, and 14166.18, respectively.

(3) To the extent not included in paragraph (1) or (2), the amount
 of the increase in state General Fund expenditures for Medi-Cal inpatient hospital services for the project year for project year private DSH hospitals and nondesignated public hospitals, including amounts expended in accordance with paragraph (1) of subdivision (c) of Section 14166.23, that exceeds the expenditure amount for the same purpose and the same hospitals necessary to provide the aggregate baseline funding amounts applicable to the project determined pursuant to Sections 14166.13 and 14166.18, and any direct grants to designated public hospitals for services under the demonstration project.

(4) To the extent not included in paragraph (2), federal Medicaid funds received by the state as a result of the General Fund expenditures described in paragraph (3).

(5) The federal Medicaid funds received by the state as a result of federal financial participation with respect to
 Medi-Cal payments for inpatient hospital services made to project year private DSH hospitals and to nondesignated public hospitals for services rendered during the project year, the state share of which was derived from intergovernmental transfers or certified public expenditures of any public entity that does not own or operate a public hospital.

(6) Federal safety net care pool funds claimed and received for inpatient hospital services rendered under the health care coverage initiative identified under paragraph (3) of subdivision (e) of Section 14166.9.

(b) With respect to the 2005–06, 2006–07, and subsequent project years through October 31, 2010, the stabilization funding determined under subdivision (a) shall be allocated as follows:

(1) Eight million dollars ($8,000,000) shall be paid to San Mateo Medical
 Center. All or a portion of this amount may be paid as disproportionate share hospital payments in addition to the hospital’s allocation that would otherwise be determined under Section 14166.6. The amount provided for in this paragraph shall be disregarded in the application of the limitations described in paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) of Section 14166.6, and in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 14166.7.

(2) (A) Ninety-six million two hundred twenty-eight thousand dollars ($96,228,000) shall be allocated to designated public hospitals to be paid in accordance with Section 14166.75.

(B) Forty-two million two hundred twenty-eight thousand dollars ($42,228,000) shall be allocated to private DSH hospitals to be paid in accordance with Section 14166.14.

(C) Five hundred forty-four
 thousand dollars ($544,000) shall be allocated to nondesignated public hospitals to be paid in accordance with Section 14166.17.

(D) In the event that stabilization funding is less than one hundred forty-seven million dollars ($147,000,000), the amounts allocated to designated public hospitals, private DSH hospitals, and nondesignated public hospitals under this paragraph shall be reduced proportionately.

(3) (A) An amount equal to the lesser of 10 percent of the total amount determined under subdivision (a) or twenty-three million five hundred thousand dollars ($23,500,000), but at least fifteen million three hundred thousand dollars ($15,300,000), shall be made available for additional payments to distressed hospitals that participate in the selective provider contracting program under Article 2.6 (commencing with Section 14081), including designated public
 hospitals, in amounts to be determined by the California Medical Assistance Commission. The additional payments to designated public hospitals shall be negotiated by the California Medical Assistance Commission, but shall be paid by the department in the form of a direct grant rather than as Medi-Cal payments.

(B) Notwithstanding subparagraph (A) and solely for the 2006–07 fiscal year, if the amount that otherwise would be made available for additional payments to distressed hospitals under subparagraph (A) is equal to or greater than eighteen million three hundred thousand dollars ($18,300,000), that amount shall be reduced by eighteen million three hundred thousand dollars ($18,300,000) and the state’s obligation to make these payments shall be reduced by this amount. In the event the amount that otherwise would be made available under subparagraph (A) is less than eighteen million three hundred thousand dollars ($18,300,000), but greater
 than or equal to the minimum amount of fifteen million three hundred thousand dollars ($15,300,000), then the amount available under this paragraph shall be zero and the state’s obligation to make these payments shall be zero.

(C) Notwithstanding subparagraph (A) and solely for the 2008–09 and 2009–10 fiscal years, the amount to be made available shall be reduced by fifteen million three hundred thousand dollars ($15,300,000) in each of the two years. The funds generated from this reduction shall be retained in the General Fund.

(4) An amount equal to 0.64 percent of the total amount determined under subdivision (a), to nondesignated public hospitals to be paid in accordance with Section 14166.19.

(5) The amount remaining after subtracting the amount determined in paragraphs (1) and (2), subparagraph (A) of paragraph
 (3), and paragraph (4), without taking into account subparagraphs (B) and (C) of paragraph (3), shall be allocated as follows:

(A) Sixty percent to designated public hospitals to be paid in accordance with Section 14166.75.

(B) Forty percent to project year private DSH hospitals to be paid in accordance with Section 14166.14.

(c) By April 1 of the year following the project year for which the payment is made, and after taking into account final amounts otherwise paid or payable to hospitals under this article, the director shall calculate in accordance with subdivision (a), allocate in accordance with subdivision (b), and pay to hospitals in accordance with Sections 14166.75, 14166.14, and 14166.19, as applicable, the stabilization funding.

(d) For
 purposes of determining amounts paid or payable to hospitals under subdivision (c), the department shall apply the following:

(1) In determining amounts paid or payable to designated public hospitals that are based on allowable costs incurred by the hospital, or the governmental entity with which it is affiliated, the following shall apply:

(A) If the final payment amount is based on the hospital’s Medicare cost report, the department shall rely on the cost report filed with the Medicare fiscal intermediary for the project year for which the calculation is made, reduced by a percentage that represents the average percentage change from total reported costs to final costs for the three most recent cost reporting periods for which final determinations have been made, taking into account all administrative and judicial appeals. Protested amounts shall not be considered in determining
 the average percentage change unless the same or similar costs are included in the project year cost report.

(B) If the final payment amount is based on costs not included in subparagraph (A), the reported costs as of the date the determination is made under subdivision (c), shall be reduced by 10 percent.

(C) In addition to adjustments required in subparagraphs (A) and (B), the department shall adjust amounts paid or payable to designated public hospitals by any applicable deferrals or disallowances identified by the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services as of the date the determination is made under subdivision (c) not otherwise reflected in subparagraphs (A) and (B).

(2) Amounts paid or payable to project year private DSH hospitals and nondesignated public hospitals shall be determined by the most
 recently available Medi-Cal paid claims data increased by a percentage to reflect an estimate of amounts remaining unpaid.

(e) The department shall consult with hospital representatives regarding the appropriate calculation of stabilization funding before stabilization funds are paid to hospitals. The calculation may be comprised of multiple steps involving interim computations and assumptions as may be necessary to determine the total amount of stabilization funding under subdivision (a) and the allocations under subdivision (b). No later than 30 days after this consultation, the department shall establish a final determination of stabilization funding that shall not be modified for any reason other than mathematical errors or mathematical omissions on the part of the department.

(f) The department shall distribute 75 percent of the estimated stabilization funding on an interim
 basis throughout the project year.

(g) The allocation and payment of stabilization funding shall not reduce the amount otherwise paid or payable to a hospital under this article or any other provision of law, unless the reduction is required by the demonstration project’s Special Terms and Conditions or by federal law.

(h) It is the intent of the Legislature that the amendments made to Section 14166.12 and to this section by the act that added this subdivision in the 2007–08 Regular Session shall not be construed to amend or otherwise alter the ongoing structure of the department’s Medicaid Demonstration Project and Waiver approved by the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services to begin on September 1, 2005.

(i) The provisions of this section shall only apply with respect to the demonstration project term,
 and shall not apply with respect to the successor demonstration project term.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 162, Sec. 220.   (SB 1171)   Effective January 1, 2013.   Conditionally inoperative as provided in Section 14166.26 or in subd. (b) or (g) of Section 14166.2.   Repealed on date prescribed in Section 14166.26 or in subd. (b) or (g) of Section 14166.2.)
-------------------------------------------

14166.21.

(a) The Health Care Support Fund is hereby established in the State Treasury. Notwithstanding Section 13340 of the Government Code, the fund shall be continuously appropriated to the department for the purposes specified in this article. The fund shall include any interest that accrues on amounts in the fund.

(b) During the term of the
 demonstration project, amounts in the Health Care Support Fund shall be paid in the following order of priority:

(1) To hospitals for services rendered to Medi-Cal beneficiaries and the uninsured in an amount necessary to meet the aggregate baseline funding amount, or the adjusted aggregate baseline funding amount for project years after the 2005-06 project year, as specified in subdivision (d) of Section 14166.5, subdivision (b) of Section 14166.13, and Section 14166.18, taking into account all other payments to each hospital under this article, except payments made from the Distressed Hospital Fund pursuant to Section 14166.23 and payments made to distressed hospitals pursuant to paragraph (3) of subdivision (b) of Section 14166.20. If the amount in the Health Care Support Fund is inadequate to provide full aggregate baseline funding, or adjusted aggregate baseline funding, to all designated public hospitals, project year private DSH
 hospitals, and nondesignated public hospitals, each group’s payments shall be reduced pro rata.

(2) To the extent necessary to maximize federal funding under the demonstration project and consistent with Section 14166.22, the department may claim safety net care pool funds based on health care expenditures incurred by the department for uncompensated medical care costs of medical services provided to uninsured individuals, as approved by the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services.

(3) Stabilization funding, allocated and paid in accordance with Sections 14166.75, 14166.14, and 14166.19, and paragraph (3) of subdivision (b) of Section 14166.20.

(4) Any amounts remaining after final reconciliation of all amounts due at the end of a project year shall remain available for payments in accordance with this
 section in the next project year.

(c) Subdivision (b) shall not apply to federal safety net care pool funds claimed and received for services rendered under the health care coverage initiative identified under paragraph (2) of subdivision (e) of Section 14166.9, which shall be paid in accordance with Part 3.5 (commencing with Section 15900) and under paragraphs 43 and 44 of the Special Terms and Conditions for the demonstration project.

(d) During the term of the successor demonstration project, amounts in the Health Care Support Fund shall be paid as follows:

(1) To the department consistent with Section 14166.22, with respect to amounts claimed by the department based on health care expenditures incurred by the state for uncompensated medical care costs of medical services provided to uninsured individuals, or
 expenditures incurred by the state for uncompensated costs of state-funded workforce development programs, as approved by the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services.

(2) To designated public hospitals and the governmental entities with which they are affiliated pursuant to Section 14166.71, with respect to amounts claimed based on certified public expenditures as reported pursuant to Section 14166.8.

(3) Any amounts remaining after final reconciliation of all amounts due at the end of a successor demonstration year shall remain available for payments in accordance with this section in the next successor demonstration year, as authorized by the Special Terms and Conditions for the successor demonstration project.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 86, Sec. 16.   (AB 1066)   Effective July 15, 2011.   Conditionally inoperative as provided in Section 14166.26 or in subd. (b) or (g) of Section 14166.2.   Repealed on date prescribed in Section 14166.26 or in subd. (b) or (g) of Section 14166.2.)
-------------------------------------------

14166.22.

(a) To the extent required to maximize available federal funds under the demonstration project and to the extent authorized by the Special Terms and Conditions for the demonstration project, the department may claim federal reimbursement for expenditures, consistent with the equitable distribution established under this article, in the following priority order:

(1) The medically indigent adults long-term care program.

(2) The Genetically Handicapped Persons Program established pursuant to Article 1 (commencing with Section 125125) of Chapter 2 of Part 5 of Division 106 of the Health and Safety Code.

(3) The Breast and Cervical Cancer Treatment Program established pursuant to Article 1.5 (commencing with Section 104160) of Chapter 2 of Part 1 of Division 103 of the Health and Safety Code.

(4) The California Children’s Services Program established pursuant to Article 5 (commencing with Section 123800) of Chapter 3 of Part 2 of Division 106 of the Health and Safety Code.

(b) Notwithstanding any other law, the federal reimbursement received as a result of a claim made pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be used to create General Fund savings solely for the department for use in support of safety net hospitals under the demonstration project.

(c) The federal reimbursement received as a result of a claim made pursuant to subdivision (a) is hereby appropriated
 to the department for the program in which the claimed expenditures were made.

(d) An amount of General Fund moneys appropriated to the department for programs specified in subdivision (a) equal to the amount of federal reimbursement identified pursuant to subdivision (c) is hereby reappropriated to the Health Care Deposit Fund to be used for the purposes set forth in this article.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 303, Sec. 621.   (AB 731)   Effective January 1, 2016.   Conditionally inoperative as provided in Section 14166.26 or in subd. (b) or (g) of Section 14166.2.   Repealed on date prescribed in Section 14166.26 or in subd. (b) or (g) of Section 14166.2.)
-------------------------------------------

14166.221.

(a) It is the intent of the Legislature for the department to maximize the receipt of federal funds for California’s Medi-Cal program, including this demonstration project, by identifying state resources which will enable the state to obtain additional federal reimbursement during this unprecedented fiscal crisis. It is further the intent of the Legislature that any program identified by the
 department for the purposes specified in this section shall not be modified or altered in any manner unless subsequent statutory authority is expressly provided by the Legislature.

(b) Notwithstanding Section 14166.22, in order to maximize federal claiming under the demonstration project, the department shall have broad discretion to claim federal reimbursement consistent with all applicable federal claiming rules for the following expenditures in an order of priority determined by the department:

(1) Expenditures in programs funded in whole or in part by realignment funds under Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 17600) of Part 5, including, but not limited to, the County Medical Services Program.

(2) Expenditures in programs funded in whole or in part by the County Mental Health Services Act.

(3) Other public expenditures, to the extent the department determines the expenditures to be appropriate for claiming under the demonstration project.

(4) Expenditures in any programs referenced in subdivision (a) of Section 14166.22 or other state-only funded programs as the department, in its discretion, determines should be used for the purposes of this section. These programs may include programs administered by other state agencies or departments.

(c) The department shall have discretion to claim under this section for any and all additional demonstration project funding made available pursuant to any amendments to the demonstration project made on or after October 1, 2008, or pursuant to any federal laws that increase the amount of available funding, including, but not limited to, the federal American Recovery
 and Reinvestment Act of 2009 (Public Law 111-5). This additional funding shall include federal funds made available due to an increase in the federal medical assistance percentage in addition to any other increase in the amount of federal funding.

(d) Any amounts received in the 2008–09, 2009–10, and 2010–11 fiscal years from the federal government pursuant to additional demonstration project funding as specified in this section shall be deposited in the Federal Trust Fund. Notwithstanding Section 28.00 of the Budget Act of 2009, the Department of Finance may authorize expenditure of these funds in a manner consistent with federal law and that offsets General Fund expenditures otherwise authorized in the Budget Act of 2009 for the Medi-Cal program, and as appropriated in Item 4260-101-0001, or for the Health Care Support Fund. For any adjustments made under the authority provided for by this section, the Department of Finance shall provide
 notification in writing to the Chairperson of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee not less than 30 days prior to the effective date of the adjustment, or not sooner than whatever lesser time the Chairperson of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee, or his or her designee, may in each instance determine. The notification to the chairperson of the joint committee shall include, at a minimum, the amounts of the proposed appropriation adjustments, a description of any assumptions used in making the adjustments, the relevant federal authority, and any other clarifying description as relevant.

(e) If the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services or any federal or state court issues a ruling that any or all federal dollars obtained by claiming for expenditures from any particular program referenced in subdivision (b) cannot be used to increase state revenues, the department may discontinue use of those expenditures for claiming under this
 section and substitute other expenditures from other programs referenced in subdivision (b) at its discretion.

(f) Notwithstanding Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the department may implement this section by means of a provider bulletin, or other similar instruction, without taking regulatory action. The department shall also provide notification to the Joint Legislative Budget Committee within five working days if that action is taken in order to inform the Legislature that the action is being implemented.

(g) (1) A portion of the additional federal funding described in subdivision (c) shall be allocated to the designated public hospitals and shall be identical in amount to the fee proceeds retained by the state under Section 14167.5.

(2) Funding under this subdivision shall be made available to the designated public hospitals in increments that reflect the quarters of the subject federal fiscal year for which payments are made to private hospitals from the Hospital Quality Assurance Revenue Fund established pursuant to Section 14167.35.

(3) The department shall claim the federal funds made available to the designated public hospitals under this subdivision upon receipt of the necessary expenditure reports and certifications from the designated public hospitals, or the governmental entities with which they are affiliated, and distribute those funds pursuant to Section 14167.5 so that receipt of the federal funds by the designated public hospitals is aligned with the payment schedule set forth in subdivision (c) of Section 14167.9.

(h) The department shall implement subdivision (g) of this section
 and subdivision (e) of Section 14167.5 only if and to the extent that all of the following are satisfied:

(1) The state has determined, after consultation with the designated public hospitals, that the designated public hospitals, or the governmental entities with which they are affiliated, have incurred sufficient expenditures during the 2009 and 2010 project years, or that portion of the 2011 project year to the extent federal funds are available under Section 15900 or under an extension of the demonstration project, so that each designated public hospital receives the total amount, taking into account grant funds under Section 14167.5 and payments under this section, that it would have received for each installment under subdivision (c) of Section 14167.9 had subdivision (e) of Section 14167.5 not been implemented.

(2) The implementation of subdivision (g) of this section and
 subdivision (e) of Section 14167.5 does not result in the receipt by any designated public hospital, or the governmental entity with which it is affiliated, of less than what would otherwise be paid to that hospital or entity pursuant to Part 3.5 (commencing with Section 15900), the sections referred to in Section 14166.35, or Article 5.21 (commencing with Section 14167.1).

(3) In determining the amount retained by the state under subdivision (e) of Section 14167.5 and made available to the designated public hospitals in subdivision (g), the department makes adjustments to the reported expenditures for possible audit disallowances, consistent with the type of adjustments applied in prior project years to reduce the likelihood of a federal recoupment.

(4) The department is satisfied that the expenditures claimed under paragraph (3) of subdivision (g) represent valid expenditures
 for the purposes of federal financial participation under the Special Terms and Conditions for the demonstration project based on federal law and guidance provided by the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services.

(5) Notwithstanding subdivision (b), the department has claimed federal reimbursement for the state-only expenditures in the programs referenced in subdivision (a) of Section 14166.22 and in the programs authorized by paragraph (4) of subdivision (b) of Section 14166.221, to the maximum extent authorized under the Special Terms and Conditions for the demonstration project.

(6) Federal financial participation is available and implementation of these provisions does not jeopardize the federal financial participation for other programs.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 218, Sec. 3.   (AB 1653)   Effective September 8, 2010.   Conditionally inoperative as provided in Section 14166.26 or in subd. (b) or (g) of Section 14166.2.   Repealed on date prescribed in Section 14166.26 or in subd. (b) or (g) of Section 14166.2.)
-------------------------------------------

14166.225.

(a) In order to implement changes in the level of funding for health care services, the director shall reduce safety net care pool payments as specified in this section.

(b) Notwithstanding the provisions of this article, safety net care pool payments made to the designated public hospitals and the South Los Angeles Medical Services Preservation Fund, for services rendered on
 or after July 1, 2009, through and including June 30, 2010, shall be reduced by 10 percent, but in no event shall the total amount of the reduction exceed fifty-four million two-hundred thousand dollars ($54,200,000).

(c) (1) Notwithstanding Section 14166.22 and any other provision of this article, the department shall increase federal claiming from the safety net care pool for the state-funded programs listed in subdivision (a) of Section 14166.22 above the amount necessary to maintain stabilization funding to private hospitals, nondesignated public hospitals, and distressed hospitals pursuant to Section 14166.20, by an amount equivalent to the reduction made pursuant to subdivision (b), but only to the extent that the state-only funded programs have sufficient costs available for the claiming of federal funds from the safety net care pool.

(2) If necessary
 to reach the full amount of the reduction set forth in subdivision (b), the department may increase federal claiming from the safety net care pool for the state-funded programs listed in subdivision (a) of Section 14166.22 for fiscal years prior to the 2009–10 fiscal year, but only to the extent that the state-only funded programs have sufficient costs available in fiscal years prior to the 2009–10 fiscal year that were not previously the basis for claiming federal funds.

(d) The General Fund savings generated pursuant to subdivision (c) shall be made available to the General Fund and shall not be subject to the provisions of subdivisions (b) and (d) of Section 14166.22.

(e) Notwithstanding Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the department may implement this section by means of a provider bulletin, or other
 similar instruction, without taking regulatory action.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, 4th Ex. Sess., Ch. 5, Sec. 48.   Effective July 28, 2009.   Conditionally inoperative as provided in Section 14166.26 or in subd. (b) or (g) of Section 14166.2.   Repealed on date prescribed in Section 14166.26 or in subd. (b) or (g) of Section 14166.2.)
-------------------------------------------

14166.23.

(a) For purposes of this section, “distressed hospitals” are hospitals that participate in selective providers contracting under Article 2.6 (commencing with Section 14081) and that meet all of the following requirements, as determined by the California Medical Assistance Commission in its discretion:

(1) The hospital serves a substantial volume of Medi-Cal patients measured either as a percentage of the hospital’s overall
 volume or by the total volume of Medi-Cal services furnished by the hospital.

(2) The hospital is a critical component of the Medi-Cal program’s health care delivery system, such that the Medi-Cal health care delivery system would be significantly disrupted if the hospital reduced its Medi-Cal services or no longer participated in the Medi-Cal program.

(3) The hospital is facing a significant financial hardship that may impair its ability to continue its range of services for the Medi-Cal program.

(b) The Distressed Hospital Fund is hereby created in the State Treasury.

(c) Notwithstanding Section 13340 of the Government Code, the fund shall be continuously appropriated to the department for the purposes specified in this section.

(d) Except as otherwise limited by this section, the fund shall consist of all of the following:

(1) The amounts transferred to the fund pursuant to subdivision (e).

(2) Any additional amounts appropriated to the fund by the Legislature.

(3) Any interest that accrues on amounts in the fund.

(e) The following amounts shall be transferred to the fund from the prior supplemental funds at the beginning of each project year.

(1) Twenty percent of the amount in the prior supplemental funds on the effective date of this article, less any and all payments for services rendered prior to July 1, 2005, but paid after July 1, 2005.

(2) Interest that accrued on the prior supplemental funds during the prior project year.
